Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1944.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 6308.1(a) introductory paragraph of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 6308.1. Safe harbor for violation of section 6308(a).(a) Immunity for the individual seeking medical attention for another.--An individual shall not be prosecuted for an offense under section 6308(a) (relating to purchase, consumption, possession or transportation of liquor or malt or brewed beverages) or 2705 (relating to recklessly endangering another person) if the individual can establish all of the following:* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.AMENDING TITLE 18 (CRIMES AND OFFENSES) OF THE PENNSYLVANIA <--<--123456789101112131415161718 CONSOLIDATED STATUTES, IN ASSAULT, FURTHER PROVIDING FOR THE OFFENSE OF RECKLESSLY ENDANGERING ANOTHER PERSON.THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF PENNSYLVANIA HEREBY ENACTS AS FOLLOWS:SECTION 1. SECTION 2705 OF TITLE 18 OF THE PENNSYLVANIA CONSOLIDATED STATUTES IS AMENDED TO READ:§ 2705. RECKLESSLY ENDANGERING ANOTHER PERSON.(A) OFFENSE DEFINED.--A PERSON COMMITS A MISDEMEANOR OF THE SECOND DEGREE IF HE RECKLESSLY ENGAGES IN CONDUCT WHICH PLACES OR MAY PLACE ANOTHER PERSON IN DANGER OF DEATH OR SERIOUS BODILY INJURY.(B) IMMUNITY FOR PERSONS SEEKING MEDICAL ATTENTION FOR ANOTHER.--(1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2), A PERSON SHALL BE IMMUNE FROM PROSECUTION UNDER THIS SECTION WHO, IN GOOD FAITH:(I) REPORTS A MEDICAL EMERGENCY TO A LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER, THE 911 SYSTEM, A CAMPUS SECURITY OFFICER OR EMERGENCY SERVICES PERSONNEL, REGARDLESS OF THE TIMELINESS OF THE REPORT;(II) RENDERS EMERGENCY CARE, TREATMENT, FIRST AID OR RESCUE AT THE SCENE OF AN EMERGENCY EVENT OR CRIME, WHETHER OR NOT THE PERSON IS TRAINED TO PRACTICE MEDICINE; OR(III) MOVES THE PERSON EXPERIENCING A MEDICAL EMERGENCY TO A HOSPITAL OR OTHER PLACE OF MEDICAL CARE.(2) IMMUNITY PROVIDED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) SHALL NOT APPLY IF THE UNDERLYING MEDICAL EMERGENCY WOULD NOT HAVE OCCURRED BUT FOR THE CONDUCT OF THE PERSON INVOKING THE IMMUNITY.(C) DEFINITIONS.--AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING 20250HB1944PN3615 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728293031 WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"911 SYSTEM." A SYSTEM, INCLUDING ENHANCED 911 SERVICE AND A WIRELESS E-911 SYSTEM, THAT PERMITS A PERSON DIALING 911 BY TELEPHONE TO BE CONNECTED TO A PUBLIC SAFETY ANSWERING POINT, VIA NORMAL TELEPHONE FACILITIES, FOR THE REPORTING OF POLICE, FIRE, MEDICAL OR OTHER EMERGENCY SITUATIONS."ALCOHOL-INDUCED MEDICAL EMERGENCY." AN ACUTE MEDICAL CONDITION, INCLUDING SEVERE PHYSICAL ILLNESS, COMA, MANIA, HYSTERIA OR DEATH, THAT:(1) IS THE RESULT OF THE CONSUMPTION OF ALCOHOL OR ALCOHOL IN COMBINATION WITH THE USE OF ONE OR MORE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES CAUSING AN ADVERSE REACTION.(2) A PRUDENT LAYPERSON, POSSESSING AN AVERAGE KNOWLEDGE OF MEDICINE AND HEALTH, WOULD REASONABLY BELIEVE IS IN FACT INDUCED BY ALCOHOL CONSUMPTION AND REQUIRES IMMEDIATE MEDICAL ATTENTION."CAMPUS SECURITY OFFICER." AN EMPLOYEE OF AN INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION CHARGED WITH MAINTAINING THE SAFETY AND SECURITY OF THE PROPERTY OF THE INSTITUTION AND THE PERSONS ON THE PROPERTY."DRUG OVERDOSE EVENT." AN ACUTE MEDICAL CONDITION, INCLUDING SEVERE PHYSICAL ILLNESS, COMA, MANIA, HYSTERIA OR DEATH, THAT:(1) IS THE RESULT OF THE CONSUMPTION OR USE OF ONE OR MORE CONTROLLED SUBSTANCES CAUSING AN ADVERSE REACTION.(2) A PRUDENT LAYPERSON, POSSESSING AN AVERAGE KNOWLEDGE OF MEDICINE AND HEALTH, WOULD REASONABLY BELIEVE IS IN FACT A DRUG OVERDOSE AND REQUIRES IMMEDIATE MEDICAL ATTENTION."EMERGENCY SERVICES PERSONNEL." A PERSON, INCLUDING A TRAINED VOLUNTEER OR A MEMBER OF THE ARMED FORCES OF THE UNITED 20250HB1944PN3615 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 STATES OR THE NATIONAL GUARD, WHOSE OFFICIAL OR ASSIGNED RESPONSIBILITIES INCLUDE PERFORMING OR DIRECTLY SUPPORTING THE PERFORMANCE OF EMERGENCY MEDICAL AND RESCUE SERVICES OR FIREFIGHTING."LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER." A PERSON WHO BY VIRTUE OF THE PERSON'S OFFICE OR PUBLIC EMPLOYMENT IS VESTED BY LAW WITH A DUTY TO MAINTAIN PUBLIC ORDER OR TO MAKE ARRESTS FOR OFFENSES, WHETHER THAT DUTY EXTENDS TO ALL OFFENSES OR IS LIMITED TO SPECIFIC OFFENSES, OR A PERSON ON ACTIVE STATE DUTY UNDER 51 PA.C.S. § 508 (RELATING TO ACTIVE DUTY FOR EMERGENCY)."MEDICAL EMERGENCY." A SITUATION WHICH, IN A PERSON'S GOOD FAITH JUDGMENT, CREATES AN IMMEDIATE THREAT OF SERIOUS RISK TO THE LIFE OR PHYSICAL HEALTH OF ANOTHER PERSON. THE TERM INCLUDES AN ALCOHOL-INDUCED MEDICAL EMERGENCY AND A DRUG OVERDOSE EVENT.SECTION 2. THIS ACT SHALL TAKE EFFECT IN 60 DAYS.20250HB1944PN3615 - 4 - 123456789101112131415